Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.382

Pollinator extension education and outreach program.

The Washington State University extension program must develop a pollinator extension education and outreach program and develop a statewide, science-based, pollinator education plan to educate beekeepers, agricultural producers, land managers, licensed pesticide applicators, other professionals, and the public. The plan should emphasize pollinator best management practices for both native and managed species.

[ 2021 c 278 s 6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—2021 c 278: See note following RCW 43.23.300.